Missouri, session 2026, SB944.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 57.540, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 57.540,
to read as follows:
57.540. 1. The sheriff of the City of St. Louis may
employ an attorney at law to aid and advise him in the
discharge of his duties and to represent him in court[,
which said attorney shall be known as "sheriff's attorney",
and who shall receive as compensation for his services as
such sheriff's attorney a sum of not less than three
thousand dollars and not more than fifteen thousand dollars
per annum, payable in semimonthly installments]. The
sheriff shall set the compensation for an attorney hired
pursuant to this section, such compensation shall be paid
out of the same funds and revenue as the sheriff of such
city is paid.
2. The attorney employed by a sheriff pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section shall be employed at the
pleasure of the sheriff.
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.